Utah statutes.
63M-10-201.   Creation -- Purpose -- Administration -- Access.
(1)  There is created the Serious Habitual Offender Comprehensive Action
Program (SHOCAP) to establish a SHOCAP Database to identify and track youthful
offenders in order to assist agencies in providing collaborative and
comprehensive services to them.
(2)  The database shall be administered by the Administrative Office of the
Courts with information contributed by the following agencies:
(a)  the State Office of Education, including all school districts;
(b)  the Department of Health;
(c)  the Department of Human Services, including all county mental health
agencies;
(d)  the Department of Public Safety;
(e)  all county and municipal law enforcement agencies; and
(f)  all county and district attorney offices.
(3)  The database shall be maintained in accordance with guidelines
established by the Administrative Office of the Courts so that the agencies
listed in Subsection (2) can efficiently access the database.
(4)  Information provided by schools in compliance with the provisions of this
chapter is authorized under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act
Regulations, 34 CFR Part 99.
(5)  Information in the database provided by an agency to the database is
considered to be the property of the agency providing the information and
retains any classification given it under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government
Records Access and Management Act.
(6)  Any person who knowingly releases or discloses information from the
database for a purpose other than authorized by this chapter or to a person
who is not entitled to it is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(7)  Neither the state nor the courts are liable to any person for gathering,
managing, or using the information in the database as provided in this
chapter.
